Illinois, session 104th, HB51.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1030 and 6z-144 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Carbon Dioxide Pipeline Fund. 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-144 new)9    Sec. 6z-144. Carbon Dioxide Pipeline Fund; creation. The 10Carbon Dioxide Pipeline Fund is hereby created as a special 11fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by 12the Illinois Commerce Commission to supervise and regulate the 13operations of the carbon dioxide pipeline industry in 14Illinois. As used in this Section, "carbon dioxide pipeline" 15has the meaning given to that term in Section 10 of the Carbon 16Dioxide Transportation and Sequestration Act. 17    Section 10. The Illinois Hydraulic Fracturing Tax Act is 18amended by changing Section 2-75 as follows: 19    (35 ILCS 450/2-75)20    Sec. 2-75. Distribution of proceeds. Of the All moneys   HB0051- 2 -LRB104 03405 HLH 13427 b1received by the Department under this Act on or after the 2effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 3Assembly, 80% shall be paid into the Pension Stabilization 4Fund and 20% shall be paid into the Carbon Dioxide Pipeline 5Fund shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund in the State 6treasury.7(Source: P.A. 98-22, eff. 6-17-13.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.